Washington statutes.
RCW 41.56.490

Uniformed employees—Strikes prohibited—Violations—Contempt of court.

The right of uniformed employees to engage in any strike, work slowdown, or stoppage is not granted. An organization recognized as the bargaining representative of uniformed employees subject to this chapter that willfully disobeys a lawful order of enforcement by a superior court pursuant to RCW 41.56.480 and 41.56.490, or willfully offers resistance to such order, whether by strike or otherwise, is in contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW. An employer that willfully disobeys a lawful order of enforcement by a superior court pursuant to RCW 41.56.480 or willfully offers resistance to such order is in contempt of court as provided in chapter 7.21 RCW.

[ 1989 c 373 s 24; 1973 c 131 s 8.]

NOTES:

Construction—1973 c 131: See RCW 41.56.905.